Washington statutes.
RCW 12.20.050

Setoff—Limitation of judgment.

When the setoff of the defendant proved shall exceed the claim of the plaintiff, and such excess in amount exceed the jurisdiction of a justice of the peace, the court shall allow such amount as is necessary to cancel the plaintiff's claim, and give the defendant a judgment for costs; but in such case, the court shall not render judgment for any further sum in favor of the defendant.

[Code 1881 s 1768; 1873 p 346 s 67; 1854 p 232 s 55; RRS s 1861.]